Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Article III Management of Condominium

34-36.1-3.01.
Organization of unit owners’ association.

A unit owners’ association must be organized no later than the date the first unit in the condominium is conveyed to a purchaser. The membership of the association at all times shall consist exclusively of all the unit owners or, following termination of the condominium, of all former unit owners entitled to distributions of proceeds under §

34-36.1-2.18

, or their heirs, successors, or assigns. The association shall be organized as a profit or nonprofit corporation or as an unincorporated association. In the case of an unincorporated association, a certificate evidencing the names of the executive board members and mailing address for the association shall be recorded with the municipal land records department for the city or town in which the condominium is located, which shall be updated as often as necessary to reflect any changes in the composition of the executive board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 246, § 1.

34-36.1-3.02.
Powers of unit owners’ association.

Except as provided in subsection (b), and subject to the provisions of the declaration, the association, even if unincorporated, may:

Adopt and amend bylaws and rules and regulations;

Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves and collect assessments for common expenses from unit owners;

Hire and discharge managing agents and other employees, agents and independent contractors;

Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two (2) or more unit owners on matters affecting the condominium;

Make contracts and incur liabilities;

Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement and modification of common elements;

Cause additional improvements to be made as a part of the common elements;

Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title or interest to real or personal property, but common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest or mortgage only pursuant to §

34-36.1-3.12

;

Grant easements, leases, licenses and concessions through or over the common elements;

Impose and receive any payments, fees, or charges for the use, rental, or operation of the common elements other than limited common elements described in §

34-36.1-2.02(2)

and (4) and for services provided to unit owners;

Impose charges for late payment of assessments and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, levy reasonable fines for violations of the declaration, bylaws, and rules and regulations of the association as provided in §

34-36.1-3.20

;

Impose reasonable charges for the preparation and recordation of amendments to the declaration, resale certificates required by §

34-36.1-4.09

or statements of unpaid assessments;

Provide for the indemnification of its officers and executive board and maintain directors’ and officers’ liability insurance;

Borrow funds including the right to assign and/or pledge its right to future income, including the right to receive common expense assessments;

Exercise any other powers conferred by the declaration or bylaws;

Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this state by legal entities of the same type as the association; and

Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the governance and operation of the association.

The declaration may not impose limitations on the powers of the association to deal with the declarant that are more restrictive than the limitations imposed on the power of the association to deal with other persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 6; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 246, § 1.

34-36.1-3.03.
Executive board members and officers.

Except as provided in the declaration, the bylaws, subsection (b), or in other provisions of this chapter, the executive board may act in all instances on behalf of the association. In the performance of their duties, the officers and members of the executive board are required to exercise:

If appointed by the declarant, the care required of fiduciaries of the unit owners; and

If elected by the unit owners, ordinary and reasonable care.

The executive board may not act on behalf of the association to amend the declaration (§

34-36.1-2.17

), to terminate the condominium, or to elect members of the executive board or determine the qualifications, powers and duties, or terms of office of executive board members, but the executive board may fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of any term.

Within thirty (30) days after adoption of any proposed budget for the condominium, the executive board shall provide a summary of the budget to all the unit owners, and shall set a date for a meeting of the unit owners to consider ratification of the budget not less than fourteen (14) nor more than thirty (30) days after mailing of the summary. Unless at that meeting a majority of all the unit owners or any larger vote specified in the declaration reject the budget, the budget is ratified, whether or not a quorum is present. In the event the proposed budget is rejected, the periodic budget last ratified by the unit owners shall be continued until such time as the unit owners ratify a subsequent budget proposed by the executive board.

Subject to subsection (e), the declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the association, during which period a declarant, or persons designated by him, may appoint and remove the officers and members of the executive board. Regardless of the period provided in the declaration, a period of declarant control terminates no later than the earlier of:

Sixty (60) days after conveyance of eighty percent (80%) of the units which may be created to unit owners other than a declarant;

Two (2) years after all declarants have ceased to offer units for sale in the ordinary course of business; or

Two (2) years after any development right to add new units was last exercised.

A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to appoint and remove officers and members of the executive board before terminations of that period, but in that event he or she may require, for the duration of the period of declarant control, that specified actions of the association or executive board, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.

Not later than sixty (60) days after conveyance of twenty-five percent (25%) of the units which may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, at least one member and not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the members of the executive board must be elected by unit owners other than the declarant. Not later than sixty (60) days after conveyance of fifty percent (50%) of the units which may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, not less than one-third (1/3) of the members of the executive board must be elected by unit owners other than the declarant.

Not later than the termination of any period of declarant control, the unit owners shall elect an executive board of at least three (3) members, at least a majority of whom must be unit owners. The executive board shall elect the officers. The executive board members and officers shall take office upon election.

Notwithstanding any provision of the declaration or bylaws to the contrary, the unit owners, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of all persons present and entitled to vote at any meeting of the unit owners at which a quorum is present, may remove any member of the executive board with or without cause, other than a member appointed by the declarant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.04.
Transfer of special declarant rights.

No special declarant right created or reserved under this chapter may be transferred except by an instrument evidencing the transfer recorded in every municipality in which any portion of the condominium is located. The instrument is not effective unless executed by the transferee.

Upon transfer of any special declarant right, the liability of a transferor declarant is as follows:

A transferor is not relieved of any obligation or liability arising before the transfer and remains liable for warranty obligations imposed upon him or her by this chapter. Lack of privity does not deprive any unit owner of standing to bring an action to enforce any obligations of the transferor.

If the successor to any special declarant right is an affiliate of a declarant, the transferor is jointly and severally liable with the successor for any obligation or liability of the successor which relates to the condominium.

If a transferor retains any special declarant right, but transfers other special declarant rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the declarant, the transferor is liable for any obligations or liabilities imposed on declarant by this chapter or by the declaration relating to the retained special declarant rights and arising after the transfer.

A transferor has no liability for any act or omission or any breach of a contractual or warranty obligation arising from the exercise of a special declarant right by a successor declarant who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Unless otherwise provided in a mortgage instrument or deed of trust, in case of foreclosure of a mortgage, tax sale, judicial sale, sale by a trustee under a deed of trust, or sale under the federal Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. § 101 et seq., or receivership proceedings, of any units owned by a declarant or real estate in a condominium subject to development rights, a person acquiring title to all the real estate being foreclosed or sold, but only upon his or her request, succeeds to all special declarant rights related to that real estate held by that declarant, or only to any rights reserved in the declaration pursuant to §

34-36.1-2.15

and held by that declarant to maintain models, sales and signs. The judgment or instrument conveying title shall provide for transfer of only the special declarant rights requested.

Upon foreclosure, tax sale, judicial sale, sale by a trustee under a deed of trust, or sale under the federal Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. § 101 et seq., or receivership proceedings, of all units and other real estate in a condominium owned by a declarant:

The declarant ceases to have any special declarant rights, and

The period of declarant control terminates unless the judgment or instrument conveying title provides for transfer of all special declarant rights held by that declarant to a successor declarant.

The liabilities and obligations of persons who succeed to special declarant rights are as follows:

A successor to any special declarant right who is an affiliate of a declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed on the transferor by this chapter or by the declaration.

A successor to any special declarant right, other than a successor described in subdivision (e)(2) or (3), who is not an affiliate of a declarant, is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed by this chapter or the declaration:

On a declarant which relates to his or her exercise or nonexercise of special declarant rights; or

On his or her transferor, other than:

Misrepresentations by any previous declarant;

Warranty obligations on improvements made by any previous declarant, or made before the condominium was created;

Breach of any fiduciary obligations by any previous declarant or his or her appointees to the executive board; or

Any liability or obligations imposed on the transferor as a result of the transferor’s acts or omissions after the transfer.

A successor to only a right reserved in the declaration to maintain models, sales offices, and signs, if he or she is not an affiliate of a declarant, may not exercise any other special declarant right, and is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant, except the obligations to provide a public offering statement and any liability arising as a result thereof.

A successor to all special declarant rights held by his or her transferor who is not an affiliate of that declarant and who succeeded to those rights pursuant to a deed in lieu of foreclosure or a judgment or instrument conveying title to units under subsection (c), may declare his or her intention in a recorded instrument to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person. Thereafter, until transferring all special declarant rights to any person acquiring title to any unit owned by the successor, or until recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, that successor may not exercise any of those rights other than any right held by his or her transferor to control the executive board in accordance with the provisions of §

34-36.1-3.03(d)

for the duration of any period of declarant control, and any attempted exercise of those rights is void. So long as a successor declarant may not exercise special declarant rights under this subsection, he or she is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant other than liability for his or her acts and omissions under §

34-36.1-3.03(d)

.

Nothing in this section subjects any successor to a special declarant right to any claims against or other obligations of a transferor declarant, other than claims and obligations arising under this chapter or the declaration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.05.
Termination of contracts and leases of declarant.

If entered into before the executive board elected by the unit owners pursuant to §

34-36.1-3.03(f)

takes office, (1) any management contract, employment contract, or lease of recreational or parking areas or facilities, (2) any other contract or lease between the association and a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant, or (3) any contract or lease that is not bona fide or was unconscionable to the unit owners at the time entered into under the circumstances then prevailing, may be terminated without penalty by the association at any time after the executive board elected by the unit owners pursuant to §

34-36.1-3.03(f)

takes office upon not less than ninety (90) days’ notice to the other party. This section does not apply to any lease the termination of which would terminate the condominium or reduce its size, unless the real estate subject to that lease was included in the condominium for the purpose of avoiding the right of the association to terminate a lease under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.06.
Bylaws.

The bylaws of the association must provide for:

The number of members of the executive board and the titles of the officers of the association;

Election by the executive board of a president, treasurer, secretary, and any other officers of the association the bylaws specify;

The qualifications, powers and duties, terms of office, and manner of electing and removing executive board members and officers and filling vacancies;

Which, if any, of its powers the executive board or officers may delegate to other persons or to a managing agent;

Which of its officers may prepare, execute, certify and record amendments to the declaration on behalf of the association; and

The method of amending the bylaws.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, the bylaws may provide for any other matters the association deems necessary and appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.07.
Upkeep of condominium.

Except to the extent provided by the declaration, subsection (b), or §

34-36.1-3.13(h)

, the association is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common elements, and each unit owner is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of his or her unit. Each unit owner shall afford to the association and the other unit owners, and to their agents or employees, access through his or her unit reasonably necessary for those purposes. If damage is inflicted on the common elements, or on any unit through which access is taken, the unit owner responsible for the damage, or the association if it is responsible, is liable for the prompt repair thereof.

In addition to the liability that a declarant as a unit owner has under this chapter, the declarant alone is liable for all expenses in connection with real estate subject to development rights. No other unit owner and no other portion of the condominium is subject to a claim for payment of those expenses. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any income or proceeds from real estate subject to development rights inures to the declarant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.08.
Meetings.

A meeting of the association must be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the association may be called by the president, a majority of the executive board or by unit owners having twenty percent (20%), or any lower percentage specified in the bylaws, of the votes in the association. Not less than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days in advance of any meeting, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the unit owner. The notice of any meeting must state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, any budget changes, and any proposal to remove a director or officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.09.
Quorums.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is present throughout any meeting of the association if persons entitled to cast twenty percent (20%) of the votes which may be cast for election of the executive board are present in person or by proxy at the beginning of the meeting.

Unless the bylaws specify a larger percentage, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the executive board if persons entitled to cast fifty percent (50%) of the votes on that board are present at the beginning of the meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.10.
Voting — Proxies.

If only one of the multiple owners of a unit is present at a meeting of the association, that person is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that unit. If more than one of the multiple owners are present, the votes allocated to that unit may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the multiple owners, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is majority agreement if any one of the multiple owners casts the votes allocated to that unit without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other owners of the unit.

Votes allocated to a unit may be cast pursuant to a proxy duly executed by a unit owner. If a unit is owned by more than one person, each owner of the unit may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other owners of the unit through a duly executed proxy. A unit owner may not revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section except by actual notice of revocation to the person presiding over a meeting of the association. A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice. A proxy terminates one year after its date, unless it specifies a shorter term.

If the declaration requires that votes on specified matters affecting the condominium be cast by lessees rather than unit owners of leased units: (1) the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) apply to lessees as if they were unit owners; (2) unit owners who have leased their units to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and (3) lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were unit owners. Unit owners must also be given notice, in the manner provided in §

34-36.1-3.08

, of all meetings at which lessees may be entitled to vote.

No votes allocated to a unit owned by the association may be cast.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.11.
Tort and contract liability.

Neither the association nor any unit owner except the declarant is liable for that declarant’s torts in connection with any part of the condominium which that declarant has the responsibility to maintain. Otherwise, an action alleging a wrong done by the association must be brought against the association and not against any unit owner. If the wrong occurred during any period of declarant control and the association gives the declarant reasonable notice of and an opportunity to defend against the action, the declarant who then controlled the association is liable to the association or to any unit owner: (1) for all tort losses not covered by insurance suffered by the association or that unit owner, and (2) for all costs which the association would not have incurred but for a breach of contract or other wrongful act or omission. Whenever the declarant is liable to the association under this section, the declarant is also liable for all litigation expenses, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, incurred by the association. Any statute of limitation affecting the association’s right of action under this section is tolled until the period of declarant control terminates. A unit owner is not precluded from bringing an action contemplated by this section because he or she is a unit owner or a member or officer of the association. Liens resulting from judgments against the association are governed by §

34-36.1-3.17

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.12.
Conveyance or encumbrance of common elements.

Portions of the common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest or mortgage by the association if persons entitled to cast at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the association, including eighty percent (80%) of the votes allocated to units not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, agree to that action; but all the owners of units to which any limited common element is allocated must agree in order to convey that limited common element or subject it to a security interest or mortgage. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. Proceeds of the sale are an asset of the association.

An agreement to convey common elements or subject them to a security interest must be evidenced by the execution of an agreement, or ratifications thereof, in the same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of unit owners. The agreement must specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless recorded before that date. The agreement and all ratifications thereof must be recorded in every municipality in which a portion of the condominium is situated, and is effective only upon recordation.

The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract to convey common elements, or subject them to a security interest, but the contract is not enforceable against the association until approved pursuant to subsections (a) and (b). Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the conveyance or encumbrance, including the power to execute deeds or other instruments.

Any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale or other voluntary transfer of common elements, unless made pursuant to this section, is void.

A conveyance or encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section does not deprive any unit of its rights of access and support.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides, a conveyance or encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section does not affect the priority or validity of preexisting encumbrances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

Partition.

A plain reading of the condominium statute indicates that the common elements of the condominium cannot be partitioned or transferred, voluntarily or otherwise, in favor of a member of the association or one who holds jointly or in common with said member in the absence of a vote by at least 80 percent of the membership of the association. St. Jean Place Condo. Ass'n v. DeLeo, 745 A.2d 738,

2000 R.I. LEXIS 23

(R.I. 2000).

34-36.1-3.13.
Insurance.

Commencing not later than the time of the first conveyance of a unit to a person other than a declarant, the association shall maintain, to the extent reasonably available:

Property insurance on the common elements insuring against all risks of direct, physical loss commonly insured against or, in the case of a conversion building, against fire and extended coverage perils. The total amount of insurance after application of any deductibles shall be not less than eighty percent (80%) of the actual cash value of the insured property at the time the insurance is purchased and at each renewal date, exclusive of land, excavations, foundations, and other items normally excluded from property policies; and

Liability insurance, including medical payments insurance, in an amount determined by the executive board, but not less than any amount specified in the declaration, covering all occurrences commonly insured against for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of, or in connection with, the use, ownership, or maintenance of the common elements and any property owned or leased by the association.

In the case of a building containing units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, the insurance maintained under subdivision (a)(1), to the extent reasonably available, shall include the units, but need not include improvements and betterments installed by unit owners.

If the insurance described in subsections (a) and (b) is not reasonably available, the association promptly shall cause notice of that fact to be hand delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to all unit owners. The declaration may require the association to carry any other insurance, and the association in any event may carry any other insurance it deems appropriate to protect the association or the unit owners.

Insurance policies carried pursuant to subsection (a) must provide that:

Each unit owner is an insured person under the policy with respect to liability arising out of the owner’s interest in the common elements or membership in the association;

The insurer waives its right to subrogation under the policy against any unit owner or member of the owner’s household;

No act or omission by any unit owner, unless acting within the scope of his or her authority on behalf of the association, will void the policy or be a condition to recovery under the policy; and

If, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a unit owner covering the same risk covered by the policy, the association’s policy provides primary insurance. Provided, however, a unit owner’s insurance policy shall become the primary insurance policy with respect to any amount of loss covered by the association’s policy but not payable under the association’s policy because of the application of the deductible.

Any loss covered by the property policy under subdivision (a)(1) and subsection (b) must be adjusted with the association, but the insurance proceeds for that loss are payable to any insurance trustee designated for that purpose, or otherwise to the association, and not to any mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurance trustee or the association shall hold any insurance proceeds in trust for unit owners and lien holders as their interests may appear. Subject to the provisions of subsection (h), the proceeds must be disbursed first for the repair or restoration of the damaged property, and unit owners and lien holders are not entitled to receive payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is a surplus of proceeds after the property has been completed, repaired or restored, or the condominium is terminated.

An insurance policy issued to the association does not prevent a unit owner from obtaining insurance for his or her own benefit.

An insurer that has issued an insurance policy under this section shall issue certificates or memoranda of insurance to the association and, upon written request, to any unit owner, mortgagee, or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurer issuing the policy may not cancel or refuse to renew it until thirty (30) days after notice of the proposed cancellation or nonrenewal has been mailed to the association, each unit owner, and each mortgagee or beneficiary under a deed of trust to whom a certificate or memorandum of insurance has been issued at their respective last known addresses.

Any portion of the condominium for which insurance is required under this section that is damaged or destroyed shall be repaired or replaced promptly by the association unless: (1) The condominium is terminated; (2) Repair or replacement would be illegal under any state or local health or safety statute or ordinance; or (3) Eighty percent (80%) of the unit owners, including every owner of a unit or assigned, limited common element that will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild unless insurance proceeds are adequate to rebuild. The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds, after the application of the association’s policy deductible, is a common expense, unless the declaration provides otherwise. If the entire condominium is not repaired or replaced, (1) The insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged common elements must be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the condominium; (2) The insurance proceeds attributable to units and limited common elements that are not rebuilt must be distributed to the owners of those units and the owners of the units to which those limited common elements were allocated, or to lienholders, as their interests may appear; and (3) The remainder of the proceeds must be distributed to all the unit owners or lienholders, as their interests may appear, in proportion to the common element interests of all the units. If the unit owners vote not to rebuild any unit, that unit’s allocated interests are automatically reallocated upon the vote as if the unit had been condemned under §

34-36.1-1.07(a)

and the association promptly shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration reflecting the reallocations. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, §

34-36.1-2.18

governs the distribution of insurance proceeds if the condominium is terminated.

In the event a unit owner sustains damage to the owner’s unit as a result of an event that is covered under the insurance coverage purchased in accordance with this section, then upon written request to the condominium association, the unit owner shall be entitled to a written copy from the condominium association of the insurance company damage appraisal or any damage appraisal in regard to damage to the owner’s unit, within fourteen (14) calendar days of the date of the unit owner’s request, or within fourteen (14) days of the association’s receipt of the damage appraisal, whichever is later. If coverage for the damage to a unit is denied for any reason or is deemed to be valued below the policy deductible, then the unit owner shall also be entitled to receive, from the association, a copy of the letter detailing the determination.

The provisions of this section may be varied or waived in the case of a condominium all of whose units are restricted to nonresidential use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 305, § 1, effective June 28, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 306, § 1, effective June 28, 2022.

34-36.1-3.14.
Surplus funds.

Unless otherwise provided in the declaration, any surplus funds of the association remaining after payment of or provision for common expenses and any prepayment of reserves must be paid to the unit owners in proportion to their common expense liability or credited to them to reduce their future common expense assessments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2.

34-36.1-3.15.
Assessments for common expenses.

Until the association makes a common expense assessment, the declarant shall pay all common expenses. After any assessment has been made by the association, assessments must be made at least annually, based on a budget adopted at least annually by the association.

Except for assessments under subsections (c) — (e), all common expenses must be assessed against all the units in accordance with the allocations set forth in the declaration pursuant to §

34-36.1-2.07(a)

. Any past due common expense assessment or installment thereof bears interest at the rate established by the association not exceeding twenty-one percent (21%) per year.

Except in the case of a condominium in which all units are restricted to non-residential use, the declarant must pay common expense assessments to the association on all units it owns once a common expense assessment is imposed; the obligation of the declarant to pay common expense assessments on the units it owns shall commence when the declaration or an amendment to a declaration adding units to a condominium is recorded, for those units referenced in the declaration or in any amendment to the declaration, pursuant to §

34-36.1-2.01

.

To the extent required by the declaration:

Any common expense associated with the maintenance, repair or replacement of a limited common element must be assessed against the units to which that limited common element is assigned, equally, or in any other proportion that the declaration provides;

Any common expense or portion thereof benefiting fewer than all of the units must be assessed exclusively against the units benefitted; and

The costs of insurance must be assessed in proportion to risk and the costs of utilities must be assessed in proportion to usage.

Assessments to pay a judgment against the association may be made only against the units in the condominium at the time the judgment was entered, in proportion to their common expense liabilities.

If any common expense is caused by the misconduct of any unit owner, the association may assess that expense exclusively against his or her unit.

If common expenses liabilities are reallocated, common expense assessments and any installment thereof not yet due shall be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated common expense liabilities.

Whenever an assessment for common expenses has remained unpaid for a period of sixty (60) days, and the condominium unit is occupied by a tenant, the association may subject to the rights of a superior lienholder make demand upon the tenant for payment of the amount in arrears, and for payment of succeeding assessments on a monthly basis. All amounts paid directly to the association shall be used as a credit against the rent owed for occupancy of the unit.

Acceptance by an association of payments made by a tenant shall not constitute a waiver of any other rights an association may have with respect to the collection of assessments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 355, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 57, § 1.